District of Columbia statutes.
51-125

Effective date.

This subchapter shall take effect as of 12:01 antemeridian on the first day of the next succeeding calendar quarter following August 28, 1935.

History

Aug. 28, 1935, 49 Stat. 956, ch. 794, § 25
as added June 4, 1943, 57 Stat. 125, ch. 117, § 1